Usage: osxphotos export [OPTIONS] [PHOTOS_LIBRARY]... DEST

  Export photos from the Photos database. Export path DEST is required.
  Optionally, query the Photos database using 1 or more search options; if
  more than one option is provided, they are treated as "AND" (e.g. search for
  photos matching all options). If no query options are provided, all photos
  will be exported. By default, all versions of all photos will be exported
  including edited versions, live photo movies, burst photos, and associated
  raw images. See --skip-edited, --skip-live, --skip-bursts, and --skip-raw
  options to modify this behavior.

Options:
  --db PHOTOS_LIBRARY_PATH        Specify Photos database path. Path to Photos
                                  library/database can be specified using
                                  either --db or directly as PHOTOS_LIBRARY
                                  positional argument. If neither --db or
                                  PHOTOS_LIBRARY provided, will attempt to
                                  find the library to use in the following
                                  order: 1. last opened library, 2. system
                                  library, 3. ~/Pictures/Photos
                                  Library.photoslibrary
  -V, --verbose                   Print verbose output.
  --timestamp                     Add time stamp to verbose output
  --no-progress                   Do not display progress bar during export.
  --keyword KEYWORD               Search for photos with keyword KEYWORD. If
                                  more than one keyword, treated as "OR", e.g.
                                  find photos matching any keyword
  --no-keyword                    Search for photos with no keyword.
  --person PERSON                 Search for photos with person PERSON. If
                                  more than one person, treated as "OR", e.g.
                                  find photos matching any person
  --album ALBUM                   Search for photos in album ALBUM. If more
                                  than one album, treated as "OR", e.g. find
                                  photos matching any album
  --folder FOLDER                 Search for photos in an album in folder
                                  FOLDER. If more than one folder, treated as
                                  "OR", e.g. find photos in any FOLDER.  Only
                                  searches top level folders (e.g. does not
                                  look at subfolders)
  --name FILENAME                 Search for photos with filename matching
                                  FILENAME. If more than one --name options is
                                  specified, they are treated as "OR", e.g.
                                  find photos matching any FILENAME.
  --uuid UUID                     Search for photos with UUID(s). May be
                                  repeated to include multiple UUIDs.
  --uuid-from-file FILE           Search for photos with UUID(s) loaded from
                                  FILE. Format is a single UUID per line.
                                  Lines preceded with # are ignored.
  --title TITLE                   Search for TITLE in title of photo.
  --no-title                      Search for photos with no title.
  --description DESC              Search for DESC in description of photo.
  --no-description                Search for photos with no description.
  --place PLACE                   Search for PLACE in photo's reverse
                                  geolocation info
  --no-place                      Search for photos with no associated place
                                  name info (no reverse geolocation info)
  --location                      Search for photos with associated location
                                  info (e.g. GPS coordinates)
  --no-location                   Search for photos with no associated
                                  location info (e.g. no GPS coordinates)
  --label LABEL                   Search for photos with image classification
                                  label LABEL (Photos 5 only). If more than
                                  one label, treated as "OR", e.g. find photos
                                  matching any label
  --uti UTI                       Search for photos whose uniform type
                                  identifier (UTI) matches UTI
  -i, --ignore-case               Case insensitive search for title,
                                  description, place, keyword, person, or
                                  album.
  --edited                        Search for photos that have been edited.
  --external-edit                 Search for photos edited in external editor.
  --favorite                      Search for photos marked favorite.
  --not-favorite                  Search for photos not marked favorite.
  --hidden                        Search for photos marked hidden.
  --not-hidden                    Search for photos not marked hidden.
  --shared                        Search for photos in shared iCloud album
                                  (Photos 5 only).
  --not-shared                    Search for photos not in shared iCloud album
                                  (Photos 5 only).
  --burst                         Search for photos that were taken in a
                                  burst.
  --not-burst                     Search for photos that are not part of a
                                  burst.
  --live                          Search for Apple live photos
  --not-live                      Search for photos that are not Apple live
                                  photos.
  --portrait                      Search for Apple portrait mode photos.
  --not-portrait                  Search for photos that are not Apple
                                  portrait mode photos.
  --screenshot                    Search for screenshot photos.
  --not-screenshot                Search for photos that are not screenshot
                                  photos.
  --slow-mo                       Search for slow motion videos.
  --not-slow-mo                   Search for photos that are not slow motion
                                  videos.
  --time-lapse                    Search for time lapse videos.
  --not-time-lapse                Search for photos that are not time lapse
                                  videos.
  --hdr                           Search for high dynamic range (HDR) photos.
  --not-hdr                       Search for photos that are not HDR photos.
  --selfie                        Search for selfies (photos taken with front-
                                  facing cameras).
  --not-selfie                    Search for photos that are not selfies.
  --panorama                      Search for panorama photos.
  --not-panorama                  Search for photos that are not panoramas.
  --has-raw                       Search for photos with both a jpeg and raw
                                  version
  --only-movies                   Search only for movies (default searches
                                  both images and movies).
  --only-photos                   Search only for photos/images (default
                                  searches both images and movies).
  --from-date DATETIME            Search by item start date, e.g.
                                  2000-01-12T12:00:00,
                                  2001-01-12T12:00:00-07:00, or 2000-12-31
                                  (ISO 8601 with/without timezone).
  --to-date DATETIME              Search by item end date, e.g.
                                  2000-01-12T12:00:00,
                                  2001-01-12T12:00:00-07:00, or 2000-12-31
                                  (ISO 8601 with/without timezone).
  --from-time TIME                Search by item start time of day, e.g.
                                  12:00, or 12:00:00.
  --to-time TIME                  Search by item end time of day, e.g. 12:00
                                  or 12:00:00.
  --year YEAR                     Search for items from a specific year, e.g.
                                  --year 2022 to find all photos from the year
                                  2022. May be repeated to search multiple
                                  years.
  --added-before DATE             Search for items added to the library before
                                  a specific date/time, e.g. --added-before
                                  e.g. 2000-01-12T12:00:00,
                                  2001-01-12T12:00:00-07:00, or 2000-12-31
                                  (ISO 8601 with/without timezone).
  --added-after DATE              Search for items added to the libray after a
                                  specific date/time, e.g. --added-after e.g.
                                  2000-01-12T12:00:00,
                                  2001-01-12T12:00:00-07:00, or 2000-12-31
                                  (ISO 8601 with/without timezone).
  --added-in-last TIME_DELTA      Search for items added to the library in the
                                  last TIME_DELTA, where TIME_DELTA is a
                                  string like '12 hrs', '1 day', '1d', '1
                                  week', '2weeks', '1 month', '1 year'. for
                                  example, `--added-in-last 7d` and `--added-
                                  in-last '1 week'` are equivalent. months are
                                  assumed to be 30 days and years are assumed
                                  to be 365 days. Common English abbreviations
                                  are accepted, e.g. d, day, days or m, min,
                                  minutes.
  --has-comment                   Search for photos that have comments.
  --no-comment                    Search for photos with no comments.
  --has-likes                     Search for photos that have likes.
  --no-likes                      Search for photos with no likes.
  --is-reference                  Search for photos that were imported as
                                  referenced files (not copied into Photos
                                  library).
  --not-reference                 Search for photos that are not references,
                                  that is, they were copied into the Photos
                                  library and are managed by Photos.
  --in-album                      Search for photos that are in one or more
                                  albums.
  --not-in-album                  Search for photos that are not in any
                                  albums.
  --duplicate                     Search for photos with possible duplicates.
                                  osxphotos will compare signatures of photos,
                                  evaluating date created, size, height,
                                  width, and edited status to find *possible*
                                  duplicates. This does not compare images
                                  byte-for-byte nor compare hashes but should
                                  find photos imported multiple times or
                                  duplicated within Photos.
  --min-size SIZE                 Search for photos with size >= SIZE bytes.
                                  The size evaluated is the photo's original
                                  size (when imported to Photos). Size may be
                                  specified as integer bytes or using SI or
                                  NIST units. For example, the following are
                                  all valid and equivalent sizes: '1048576'
                                  '1.048576MB', '1 MiB'.
  --max-size SIZE                 Search for photos with size <= SIZE bytes.
                                  The size evaluated is the photo's original
                                  size (when imported to Photos). Size may be
                                  specified as integer bytes or using SI or
                                  NIST units. For example, the following are
                                  all valid and equivalent sizes: '1048576'
                                  '1.048576MB', '1 MiB'.
  --regex REGEX TEMPLATE          Search for photos where TEMPLATE matches
                                  regular expression REGEX. For example, to
                                  find photos in an album that begins with
                                  'Beach': '--regex "^Beach" "{album}"'. You
                                  may specify more than one regular expression
                                  match by repeating '--regex' with different
                                  arguments.
  --selected                      Filter for photos that are currently
                                  selected in Photos.
  --exif EXIF_TAG VALUE           Search for photos where EXIF_TAG exists in
                                  photo's EXIF data and contains VALUE. For
                                  example, to find photos created by Adobe
                                  Photoshop: `--exif Software 'Adobe
                                  Photoshop' `or to find all photos shot on a
                                  Canon camera: `--exif Make Canon`. EXIF_TAG
                                  can be any valid exiftool tag, with or
                                  without group name, e.g. `EXIF:Make` or
                                  `Make`. To use --exif, exiftool must be
                                  installed and in the path.
  --query-eval CRITERIA           Evaluate CRITERIA to filter photos. CRITERIA
                                  will be evaluated in context of the
                                  following python list comprehension: `photos
                                  = [photo for photo in photos if CRITERIA]`
                                  where photo represents a PhotoInfo object.
                                  For example: `--query-eval photo.favorite`
                                  returns all photos that have been favorited
                                  and is equivalent to --favorite. You may
                                  specify more than one CRITERIA by using
                                  --query-eval multiple times. CRITERIA must
                                  be a valid python expression. See
                                  https://rhettbull.github.io/osxphotos/ for
                                  additional documentation on the PhotoInfo
                                  class.
  --query-function filename.py::function
                                  Run function to filter photos. Use this in
                                  format: --query-function
                                  filename.py::function where filename.py is a
                                  python file you've created and function is
                                  the name of the function in the python file
                                  you want to call. Your function will be
                                  passed a list of PhotoInfo objects and is
                                  expected to return a filtered list of
                                  PhotoInfo objects. You may use more than one
                                  function by repeating the --query-function
                                  option with a different value. Your query
                                  function will be called after all other
                                  query options have been evaluated. See https
                                  ://github.com/RhetTbull/osxphotos/blob/maste
                                  r/examples/query_function.py for example of
                                  how to use this option.
  --missing                       Export only photos missing from the Photos
                                  library; must be used with --download-
                                  missing.
  --deleted                       Include photos from the 'Recently Deleted'
                                  folder.
  --deleted-only                  Include only photos from the 'Recently
                                  Deleted' folder.
  --update                        Only export new or updated files. See also
                                  --force-update and notes below on export and
                                  --update.
  --force-update                  Only export new or updated files. Unlike
                                  --update, --force-update will re-export
                                  photos if their metadata has changed even if
                                  this would not otherwise trigger an export.
                                  See also --update and notes below on export
                                  and --update.
  --ignore-signature              When used with '--update', ignores file
                                  signature when updating files. This is
                                  useful if you have processed or edited
                                  exported photos changing the file signature
                                  (size & modification date). In this case, '
                                  --update' would normally re-export the
                                  processed files but with '--ignore-
                                  signature', files which exist in the export
                                  directory will not be re-exported. If used
                                  with '--sidecar', '--ignore-signature' has
                                  the following behavior: 1) if the metadata
                                  (in Photos) that went into the sidecar did
                                  not change, the sidecar will not be updated;
                                  2) if the metadata (in Photos) that went
                                  into the sidecar did change, a new sidecar
                                  is written but a new image file is not; 3)
                                  if a sidecar does not exist for the photo, a
                                  sidecar will be written whether or not the
                                  photo file was written or updated.
  --only-new                      If used with --update, ignores any
                                  previously exported files, even if missing
                                  from the export folder and only exports new
                                  files that haven't previously been exported.
  --limit LIMIT                   Export at most LIMIT photos. Useful for
                                  testing. May be used with --update to export
                                  incrementally.
  --dry-run                       Dry run (test) the export but don't actually
                                  export any files; most useful with
                                  --verbose.
  --export-as-hardlink            Hardlink files instead of copying them.
                                  Cannot be used with --exiftool which creates
                                  copies of the files with embedded EXIF data.
                                  Note: on APFS volumes, files are cloned when
                                  exporting giving many of the same advantages
                                  as hardlinks without having to use --export-
                                  as-hardlink.
  --touch-file                    Sets the file's modification time to match
                                  photo date.
  --overwrite                     Overwrite existing files. Default behavior
                                  is to add (1), (2), etc to filename if file
                                  already exists. Use this with caution as it
                                  may create name collisions on export. (e.g.
                                  if two files happen to have the same name)
  --retry RETRY                   Automatically retry export up to RETRY times
                                  if an error occurs during export.  This may
                                  be useful with network drives that
                                  experience intermittent errors.
  --export-by-date                Automatically create output folders to
                                  organize photos by date created (e.g.
                                  DEST/2019/12/20/photoname.jpg).
  --skip-edited                   Do not export edited version of photo if an
                                  edited version exists.
  --skip-original-if-edited       Do not export original if there is an edited
                                  version (exports only the edited version).
  --skip-bursts                   Do not export all associated burst images in
                                  the library if a photo is a burst photo.
  --skip-live                     Do not export the associated live video
                                  component of a live photo.
  --skip-raw                      Do not export associated RAW image of a
                                  RAW+JPEG pair.  Note: this does not skip RAW
                                  photos if the RAW photo does not have an
                                  associated JPEG image (e.g. the RAW file was
                                  imported to Photos without a JPEG preview).
  --skip-uuid UUID                Skip photos with UUID(s) during export. May
                                  be repeated to include multiple UUIDs.
  --skip-uuid-from-file FILE      Skip photos with UUID(s) loaded from FILE.
                                  Format is a single UUID per line.  Lines
                                  preceded with # are ignored.
  --current-name                  Use photo's current filename instead of
                                  original filename for export.  Note:
                                  Starting with Photos 5, all photos are
                                  renamed upon import.  By default, photos are
                                  exported with the the original name they had
                                  before import.
  --convert-to-jpeg               Convert all non-JPEG images (e.g. RAW, HEIC,
                                  PNG, etc) to JPEG upon export. Note: does
                                  not convert the RAW component of a RAW+JPEG
                                  pair as the associated JPEG image will be
                                  exported. You can use --skip-raw to skip
                                  exporting the associated RAW image of a
                                  RAW+JPEG pair. See also --jpeg-quality and
                                  --jpeg-ext. Only works if your Mac has a GPU
                                  (thus may not work on virtual machines).
  --jpeg-quality FLOAT RANGE      Value in range 0.0 to 1.0 to use with
                                  --convert-to-jpeg. A value of 1.0 specifies
                                  best quality, a value of 0.0 specifies
                                  maximum compression. Defaults to 1.0
                                  [0.0<=x<=1.0]
  --preview                       Export preview image generated by Photos.
                                  This is a lower-resolution image used by
                                  Photos to quickly preview the image. See
                                  also --preview-suffix and --preview-if-
                                  missing.
  --preview-if-missing            Export preview image generated by Photos if
                                  the actual photo file is missing from the
                                  library. This may be helpful if photos were
                                  not copied to the Photos library and the
                                  original photo is missing. See also
                                  --preview-suffix and --preview.
  --preview-suffix SUFFIX         Optional suffix template for naming preview
                                  photos.  Default name for preview photos is
                                  in form 'photoname_preview.ext'. For
                                  example, with '--preview-suffix _low_res',
                                  the preview photo would be named
                                  'photoname_low_res.ext'.  The default suffix
                                  is '_preview'. Multi-value templates (see
                                  Templating System) are not permitted with
                                  --preview-suffix. See also --preview and
                                  --preview-if-missing.
  --download-missing              Attempt to download missing photos from
                                  iCloud. The current implementation uses
                                  Applescript to interact with Photos to
                                  export the photo which will force Photos to
                                  download from iCloud if the photo does not
                                  exist on disk.  This will be slow and will
                                  require internet connection. This obviously
                                  only works if the Photos library is synched
                                  to iCloud.  Note: --download-missing does
                                  not currently export all burst images; only
                                  the primary photo will be exported--
                                  associated burst images will be skipped.
  --sidecar FORMAT                Create sidecar for each photo exported;
                                  valid FORMAT values: xmp, json, exiftool;
                                  --sidecar xmp: create XMP sidecar used by
                                  Digikam, Adobe Lightroom, etc. The sidecar
                                  file is named in format photoname.ext.xmp
                                  The XMP sidecar exports the following tags:
                                  Description, Title, Keywords/Tags, Subject
                                  (set to Keywords + PersonInImage),
                                  PersonInImage, CreateDate, ModifyDate,
                                  GPSLongitude, Face Regions (Metadata Working
                                  Group and Microsoft Photo). --sidecar json:
                                  create JSON sidecar useable by exiftool
                                  (https://exiftool.org/) The sidecar file can
                                  be used to apply metadata to the file with
                                  exiftool, for example: "exiftool
                                  -j=photoname.jpg.json photoname.jpg" The
                                  sidecar file is named in format
                                  photoname.ext.json; format includes tag
                                  groups (equivalent to running 'exiftool -G
                                  -j').  --sidecar exiftool: create JSON
                                  sidecar compatible with output of 'exiftool
                                  -j'. Unlike '--sidecar json', '--sidecar
                                  exiftool' does not export tag groups.
                                  Sidecar filename is in format
                                  photoname.ext.json; For a list of tags
                                  exported in the JSON and exiftool sidecar,
                                  see '--exiftool'. See also '--ignore-
                                  signature'.
  --sidecar-drop-ext              Drop the photo's extension when naming
                                  sidecar files. By default, sidecar files are
                                  named in format
                                  'photo_filename.photo_ext.sidecar_ext', e.g.
                                  'IMG_1234.JPG.xmp'. Use '--sidecar-drop-ext'
                                  to ignore the photo extension. Resulting
                                  sidecar files will have name in format
                                  'IMG_1234.xmp'. Warning: this may result in
                                  sidecar filename collisions if there are
                                  files of different types but the same name
                                  in the output directory, e.g. 'IMG_1234.JPG'
                                  and 'IMG_1234.MOV'.
  --exiftool                      Use exiftool to write metadata directly to
                                  exported photos. To use this option,
                                  exiftool must be installed and in the path.
                                  exiftool may be installed from
                                  https://exiftool.org/.  Cannot be used with
                                  --export-as-hardlink.  Writes the following
                                  metadata: EXIF:ImageDescription,
                                  XMP:Description (see also --description-
                                  template); XMP:Title; XMP:TagsList,
                                  IPTC:Keywords, XMP:Subject (see also
                                  --keyword-template, --person-keyword,
                                  --album-keyword); XMP:PersonInImage;
                                  EXIF:GPSLatitudeRef; EXIF:GPSLongitudeRef;
                                  EXIF:GPSLatitude; EXIF:GPSLongitude;
                                  EXIF:GPSPosition; EXIF:DateTimeOriginal;
                                  EXIF:OffsetTimeOriginal; EXIF:ModifyDate
                                  (see --ignore-date-modified);
                                  IPTC:DateCreated; IPTC:TimeCreated; (video
                                  files only): QuickTime:CreationDate;
                                  QuickTime:CreateDate; QuickTime:ModifyDate
                                  (see also --ignore-date-modified);
                                  QuickTime:GPSCoordinates;
                                  UserData:GPSCoordinates.
  --exiftool-path EXIFTOOL_PATH   Optionally specify path to exiftool; if not
                                  provided, will look for exiftool in $PATH.
  --exiftool-option OPTION        Optional flag/option to pass to exiftool
                                  when using --exiftool. For example,
                                  --exiftool-option '-m' to ignore minor
                                  warnings. Specify these as you would on the
                                  exiftool command line. See exiftool docs at
                                  https://exiftool.org/exiftool_pod.html for
                                  full list of options. More than one option
                                  may be specified by repeating the option,
                                  e.g. --exiftool-option '-m' --exiftool-
                                  option '-F'.
  --exiftool-merge-keywords       Merge any keywords found in the original
                                  file with keywords used for '--exiftool' and
                                  '--sidecar'.
  --exiftool-merge-persons        Merge any persons found in the original file
                                  with persons used for '--exiftool' and '--
                                  sidecar'.
  --favorite-rating               When used with --exiftool or --sidecar, set
                                  XMP:Rating=5 for photos marked as Favorite
                                  and XMP:Rating=0 for non-Favorites. If not
                                  specified, XMP:Rating is not set.
  --ignore-date-modified          If used with --exiftool or --sidecar, will
                                  ignore the photo modification date and set
                                  EXIF:ModifyDate to EXIF:DateTimeOriginal;
                                  this is consistent with how Photos handles
                                  the EXIF:ModifyDate tag.
  --person-keyword                Use person in image as keyword/tag when
                                  exporting metadata.
  --album-keyword                 Use album name as keyword/tag when exporting
                                  metadata.
  --keyword-template TEMPLATE     For use with --exiftool, --sidecar; specify
                                  a template string to use as keyword in the
                                  form '{name,DEFAULT}' This is the same
                                  format as --directory.  For example, if you
                                  wanted to add the full path to the folder
                                  and album photo is contained in as a keyword
                                  when exporting you could specify --keyword-
                                  template "{folder_album}" You may specify
                                  more than one template, for example
                                  --keyword-template "{folder_album}"
                                  --keyword-template "{created.year}". See '--
                                  replace-keywords' and Templating System
                                  below.
  --replace-keywords              Replace keywords with any values specified
                                  with --keyword-template. By default,
                                  --keyword-template will add keywords to any
                                  keywords already associated with the photo.
                                  If --replace-keywords is specified, values
                                  from --keyword-template will replace any
                                  existing keywords instead of adding
                                  additional keywords.
  --description-template TEMPLATE
                                  For use with --exiftool, --sidecar; specify
                                  a template string to use as description in
                                  the form '{name,DEFAULT}' This is the same
                                  format as --directory.  For example, if you
                                  wanted to append 'exported with osxphotos on
                                  [today's date]' to the description, you
                                  could specify --description-template
                                  "{descr} exported with osxphotos on
                                  {today.date}" See Templating System below.
  --finder-tag-template TEMPLATE  Set MacOS Finder tags to TEMPLATE. These
                                  tags can be searched in the Finder or
                                  Spotlight with 'tag:tagname' format. For
                                  example, '--finder-tag-template "{label}"'
                                  to set Finder tags to photo labels. You may
                                  specify multiple TEMPLATE values by using '
                                  --finder-tag-template' multiple times. See
                                  also '--finder-tag-keywords and Extended
                                  Attributes below.'.
  --finder-tag-keywords           Set MacOS Finder tags to keywords; any
                                  keywords specified via '--keyword-template',
                                  '--person-keyword', etc. will also be used
                                  as Finder tags. See also '--finder-tag-
                                  template and Extended Attributes below.'.
  --xattr-template ATTRIBUTE TEMPLATE
                                  Set extended attribute ATTRIBUTE to TEMPLATE
                                  value. Valid attributes are: 'authors',
                                  'comment', 'copyright', 'creator',
                                  'description', 'findercomment', 'headline',
                                  'keywords', 'participants', 'projects',
                                  'rating', 'subject', 'title', 'version'. For
                                  example, to set Finder comment to the
                                  photo's title and description: '--xattr-
                                  template findercomment "{title}; {descr}"
                                  See Extended Attributes below for additional
                                  details on this option.
  --directory DIRECTORY           Optional template for specifying name of
                                  output directory in the form
                                  '{name,DEFAULT}'. See below for additional
                                  details on templating system.
  --filename FILENAME             Optional template for specifying name of
                                  output file in the form '{name,DEFAULT}'.
                                  File extension will be added automatically--
                                  do not include an extension in the FILENAME
                                  template. See below for additional details
                                  on templating system.
  --jpeg-ext EXTENSION            Specify file extension for JPEG files.
                                  Photos uses .jpeg for edited images but many
                                  images are imported with .jpg or .JPG which
                                  can result in multiple different extensions
                                  used for JPEG files upon export.  Use
                                  --jpeg-ext to specify a single extension to
                                  use for all exported JPEG images. Valid
                                  values are jpeg, jpg, JPEG, JPG; e.g. '--
                                  jpeg-ext jpg' to use '.jpg' for all JPEGs.
  --strip                         Optionally strip leading and trailing
                                  whitespace from any rendered templates. For
                                  example, if --filename template is "{title,}
                                  {original_name}" and image has no title,
                                  resulting file would have a leading space
                                  but if used with --strip, this will be
                                  removed.
  --edited-suffix SUFFIX          Optional suffix template for naming edited
                                  photos.  Default name for edited photos is
                                  in form 'photoname_edited.ext'. For example,
                                  with '--edited-suffix _bearbeiten', the
                                  edited photo would be named
                                  'photoname_bearbeiten.ext'.  The default
                                  suffix is '_edited'. Multi-value templates
                                  (see Templating System) are not permitted
                                  with --edited-suffix.
  --original-suffix SUFFIX        Optional suffix template for naming original
                                  photos.  Default name for original photos is
                                  in form 'filename.ext'. For example, with '
                                  --original-suffix _original', the original
                                  photo would be named
                                  'filename_original.ext'.  The default suffix
                                  is '' (no suffix). Multi-value templates
                                  (see Templating System) are not permitted
                                  with --original-suffix.
  --use-photos-export             Force the use of AppleScript or PhotoKit to
                                  export even if not missing (see also '--
                                  download-missing' and '--use-photokit').
  --use-photokit                  Use with '--download-missing' or '--use-
                                  photos-export' to use direct Photos
                                  interface instead of AppleScript to export.
                                  Highly experimental alpha feature; does not
                                  work with iTerm2 (use with Terminal.app).
                                  This is faster and more reliable than the
                                  default AppleScript interface.
  --report REPORT_FILE            Write a report of all files that were
                                  exported. The extension of the report
                                  filename will be used to determine the
                                  format. Valid extensions are: .csv (CSV
                                  file), .json (JSON), .db and .sqlite (SQLite
                                  database). REPORT_FILE may be a template
                                  string (see Templating System), for example,
                                  --report 'export_{today.date}.csv' will
                                  write a CSV report file named with today's
                                  date. See also --append.
  --append                        If used with --report, add data to existing
                                  report file instead of overwriting it. See
                                  also --report.
  --cleanup                       Cleanup export directory by deleting any
                                  files which were not included in this export
                                  set. For example, photos which had
                                  previously been exported and were
                                  subsequently deleted in Photos. WARNING:
                                  --cleanup will delete *any* files in the
                                  export directory that were not exported by
                                  osxphotos, for example, your own scripts or
                                  other files.  Be sure this is what you
                                  intend before using --cleanup.  Use --dry-
                                  run with --cleanup first if you're not
                                  certain.
  --keep KEEP_PATH                When used with --cleanup, prevents file or
                                  directory KEEP_PATH from being deleted when
                                  cleanup is run. Use this if there are files
                                  in the export directory that you don't want
                                  to be deleted when --cleanup is run.
                                  KEEP_PATH may be a file path, e.g.
                                  '/Volumes/Photos/keep.jpg', or a file path
                                  and wild card, e.g. '/Volumes/Photos/*.txt',
                                  or a directory, e.g.
                                  '/Volumes/Photos/KeepMe'. KEEP_PATH may be
                                  an absolute path or a relative path. If it
                                  is relative, it must be relative to the
                                  export destination. For example if export
                                  destination is `/Volumes/Photos` and you
                                  want to keep all `.txt` files, you can
                                  specify `--keep "/Volumes/Photos/*.txt"` or
                                  `--keep "*.txt"`. If wild card is used,
                                  KEEP_PATH must be enclosed in quotes to
                                  prevent the shell from expanding the
                                  wildcard, e.g. `--keep
                                  "/Volumes/Photos/*.txt"`. If KEEP_PATH is a
                                  directory, all files and directories
                                  contained in KEEP_PATH will be kept. --keep
                                  may be repeated to keep additional
                                  files/directories.
  --add-exported-to-album ALBUM   Add all exported photos to album ALBUM in
                                  Photos. Album ALBUM will be created if it
                                  doesn't exist.  All exported photos will be
                                  added to this album. This only works if the
                                  Photos library being exported is the last-
                                  opened (default) library in Photos. This
                                  feature is currently experimental.  I don't
                                  know how well it will work on large export
                                  sets.
  --add-skipped-to-album ALBUM    Add all skipped photos to album ALBUM in
                                  Photos. Album ALBUM will be created if it
                                  doesn't exist.  All skipped photos will be
                                  added to this album. This only works if the
                                  Photos library being exported is the last-
                                  opened (default) library in Photos. This
                                  feature is currently experimental.  I don't
                                  know how well it will work on large export
                                  sets.
  --add-missing-to-album ALBUM    Add all missing photos to album ALBUM in
                                  Photos. Album ALBUM will be created if it
                                  doesn't exist.  All missing photos will be
                                  added to this album. This only works if the
                                  Photos library being exported is the last-
                                  opened (default) library in Photos. This
                                  feature is currently experimental.  I don't
                                  know how well it will work on large export
                                  sets.
  --post-command CATEGORY COMMAND
                                  Run COMMAND on exported files of category
                                  CATEGORY.  CATEGORY can be one of: exported,
                                  new, updated, skipped, missing,
                                  exif_updated, touched, converted_to_jpeg,
                                  sidecar_json_written, sidecar_json_skipped,
                                  sidecar_exiftool_written,
                                  sidecar_exiftool_skipped,
                                  sidecar_xmp_written, sidecar_xmp_skipped,
                                  error. COMMAND is an osxphotos template
                                  string, for example: '--post-command
                                  exported "echo {filepath|shell_quote} >>
                                  {export_dir}/exported.txt"', which appends
                                  the full path of all exported files to the
                                  file 'exported.txt'. You can run more than
                                  one command by repeating the '--post-
                                  command' option with different arguments.
                                  See Post Command below.
  --post-function filename.py::function
                                  Run function on exported files. Use this in
                                  format: --post-function
                                  filename.py::function where filename.py is a
                                  python file you've created and function is
                                  the name of the function in the python file
                                  you want to call.  The function will be
                                  passed information about the photo that's
                                  been exported and a list of all exported
                                  files associated with the photo. You can run
                                  more than one function by repeating the '--
                                  post-function' option with different
                                  arguments. See Post Function below.
  --exportdb EXPORTDB_FILE        Specify alternate path for database file
                                  which stores state information for export
                                  and --update. If --exportdb is not
                                  specified, export database will be saved to
                                  '.osxphotos_export.db' in the export
                                  directory.  If --exportdb is specified, it
                                  will be saved to the specified file.
  --ramdb                         Copy export database to memory during
                                  export; may improve performance when
                                  exporting over a network or slow disk but
                                  could result in losing update state
                                  information if the program is interrupted or
                                  crashes.
  --tmpdir DIR                    Specify alternate temporary directory.
                                  Default is system temporary directory.
                                  osxphotos needs to create a number of
                                  temporary files during export. In some
                                  cases, particularly if the Photos library is
                                  on an APFS volume that is not the system
                                  volume, osxphotos may run faster if you
                                  specify a temporary directory on the same
                                  volume as the Photos library.
  --load-config CONFIG_FILE       Load options from file as written with
                                  --save-config. This allows you to save a
                                  complex export command to file for later
                                  reuse. For example: 'osxphotos export <lots
                                  of options here> --save-config
                                  osxphotos.toml' then  'osxphotos export
                                  /path/to/export --load-config
                                  osxphotos.toml'. If any other command line
                                  options are used in conjunction with --load-
                                  config, they will override the corresponding
                                  values in the config file.
  --save-config CONFIG_FILE       Save options to file for use with --load-
                                  config. File format is TOML. See also
                                  --config-only.
  --config-only                   If specified, saves the config file but does
                                  not export any files; must be used with
                                  --save-config.
  --print TEMPLATE                Render TEMPLATE string for each photo being
                                  exported and print to stdout. TEMPLATE is an
                                  osxphotos template string. This may be
                                  useful for creating custom reports, etc.
                                  TEMPLATE will be printed after the photo is
                                  exported or skipped. May be repeated to
                                  print multiple template strings.
  --theme THEME                   Specify the color theme to use for --verbose
                                  output. Valid themes are 'dark', 'light',
                                  'mono', and 'plain'. Defaults to 'dark' or
                                  'light' depending on system dark mode
                                  setting.
  -h, --help                      Show this message and exit.

                                                    Export                                                    

When exporting photos, osxphotos creates a database in the top-level export folder called
'.osxphotos_export.db'.  This database preserves state information used for determining which files need to be
updated when run with --update.  It is recommended that if you later move the export folder tree you also move
the database file.

The --update option will only copy new or updated files from the library to the export folder.  If a file is
changed in the export folder (for example, you edited the exported image), osxphotos will detect this as a
difference and re-export the original image from the library thus overwriting the changes.  If using --update,
the exported library should be treated as a backup, not a working copy where you intend to make changes. If
you do edit or process the exported files and do not want them to be overwritten withsubsequent --update, use
--ignore-signature which will match filename but not file signature when exporting.

Note: The number of files reported for export and the number actually exported may differ due to live photos,
associated raw images, and edited photos which are reported in the total photos exported.

Implementation note: To determine which files need to be updated, osxphotos stores file signature information
in the '.osxphotos_export.db' database. The signature includes size, modification time, and filename.  In
order to minimize run time, --update does not do a full comparison (diff) of the files nor does it compare
hashes of the files.  In normal usage, this is sufficient for updating the library. You can always run export
without the --update option to re-export the entire library thus rebuilding the '.osxphotos_export.db'
database.


                                             Extended Attributes                                              

Some options (currently '--finder-tag-template', '--finder-tag-keywords', '-xattr-template') write additional
metadata to extended attributes in the file. These options will only work if the destination filesystem
supports extended attributes (most do). For example, --finder-tag-keyword writes all keywords (including any
specified by '--keyword-template' or other options) to Finder tags that are searchable in Spotlight using the
syntax: 'tag:tagname'. For example, if you have images with keyword "Travel" then using '--finder-tag-
keywords' you could quickly find those images in the Finder by typing 'tag:Travel' in the Spotlight search
bar. Finder tags are written to the 'com.apple.metadata:_kMDItemUserTags' extended attribute. Unlike EXIF
metadata, extended attributes do not modify the actual file. Most cloud storage services do not synch extended
attributes. Dropbox does sync them and any changes to a file's extended attributes will cause Dropbox to re-
sync the files.

The following attributes may be used with '--xattr-template':


Attribute      Description
authors        The author, or authors, of the contents of the file.  A list of strings.
               (com.apple.metadata:kMDItemAuthors)
comment        A comment related to the file.  This differs from the Finder comment, kMDItemFinderComment.
               A string. (com.apple.metadata:kMDItemComment)
copyright      The copyright owner of the file contents.  A string. (com.apple.metadata:kMDItemCopyright)
creator        Application used to create the document content (for example Word, Pages, and so on).  A
               string. (com.apple.metadata:kMDItemCreator)
description    A description of the content of the resource.  The description may include an abstract, table
               of contents, reference to a graphical representation of content or a free-text account of the
               content.  A string. (com.apple.metadata:kMDItemDescription)
findercomment  Finder comments for this file.  A string. (com.apple.metadata:kMDItemFinderComment)
headline       A publishable entry providing a synopsis of the contents of the file.  A string.
               (com.apple.metadata:kMDItemHeadline)
keywords       Keywords associated with this file. For example, Birthday, Important, etc. This differs
               from Finder tags (_kMDItemUserTags) which are keywords/tags shown in the Finder and
               searchable in Spotlight using "tag:tag_name".  A list of strings.
               (com.apple.metadata:kMDItemKeywords)
participants   The list of people who are visible in an image or movie or written about in a document. A
               list of strings. (com.apple.metadata:kMDItemParticipants)
projects       The list of projects that this file is part of. For example, if you were working on a movie
               all of the files could be marked as belonging to the project My Movie. A list of strings.
               (com.apple.metadata:kMDItemProjects)
rating         User rating of this item. For example, the stars rating of an iTunes track. An integer.
               (com.apple.metadata:kMDItemStarRating)
subject        Subject of the this item. A string. (com.apple.metadata:kMDItemSubject)
title          The title of the file. For example, this could be the title of a document, the name of a
               song, or the subject of an email message. A string. (com.apple.metadata:kMDItemTitle)
version        The version number of this file. A string. (com.apple.metadata:kMDItemVersion)

For additional information on extended attributes see:
https://developer.apple.com/documentation/coreservices/file_metadata/mditem/common_metadata_attribute_keys


                                              Templating System                                               

The templating system converts one or template statements, written in osxphotos metadata templating language, 
to one or more rendered values using information from the photo being processed.                              

In its simplest form, a template statement has the form: "{template_field}", for example "{title}" which would
resolve to the title of the photo.                                                                            

Template statements may contain one or more modifiers.  The full syntax is:                                   

"pretext{delim+template_field:subfield(field_arg)|filter[find,replace]                                        
conditional?bool_value,default}posttext"                                                                      

Template statements are white-space sensitive meaning that white space (spaces, tabs) changes the meaning of  
the template statement.                                                                                       

pretext and posttext are free form text.  For example, if a photo has title "My Photo Title" the template     
statement "The title of the photo is {title}", resolves to "The title of the photo is My Photo Title".  The   
pretext in this example is "The title if the photo is " and the template_field is {title}.                    

delim: optional delimiter string to use when expanding multi-valued template values in-place                  

+: If present before template name, expands the template in place.  If delim not provided, values are joined  
with no delimiter.                                                                                            

e.g. if Photo keywords are ["foo","bar"]:                                                                     

  "{keyword}" renders to "foo", "bar"                                                                        
  "{,+keyword}" renders to: "foo,bar"                                                                        
  "{; +keyword}" renders to: "foo; bar"                                                                      
  "{+keyword}" renders to "foobar"                                                                           

template_field: The template field to resolve.  See Template Substitutions for full list of template fields.  

:subfield: Some templates have sub-fields, For example, {exiftool:IPTC:Make}; the template_field is exiftool  
and the sub-field is IPTC:Make.                                                                               

(field_arg): optional arguments to pass to the field; for example, with {folder_album} this is used to pass   
the path separator used for joining folders and albums when rendering the field (default is "/" for           
{folder_album}).                                                                                              

|filter: You may optionally append one or more filter commands to the end of the template field using the     
vertical pipe ('|') symbol.  Filters may be combined, separated by '|' as in: {keyword|capitalize|parens}.    

Valid filters are:                                                                                            

  lower: Convert value to lower case, e.g. 'Value' => 'value'.                                               
  upper: Convert value to upper case, e.g. 'Value' => 'VALUE'.                                               
  strip: Strip whitespace from beginning/end of value, e.g. ' Value ' => 'Value'.                            
  titlecase: Convert value to title case, e.g. 'my value' => 'My Value'.                                     
  capitalize: Capitalize first word of value and convert other words to lower case, e.g. 'MY VALUE' => 'My   
   value'.                                                                                                    
  braces: Enclose value in curly braces, e.g. 'value => '{value}'.                                           
  parens: Enclose value in parentheses, e.g. 'value' => '(value')                                            
  brackets: Enclose value in brackets, e.g. 'value' => '[value]'                                             
  shell_quote: Quotes the value for safe usage in the shell, e.g. My file.jpeg => 'My file.jpeg'; only adds  
   quotes if needed.                                                                                          
  function: Run custom python function to filter value; use in format                                        
   'function:/path/to/file.py::function_name'. See example at                                                 
   https://github.com/RhetTbull/osxphotos/blob/master/examples/template_filter.py                             
  split(x): Split value into a list of values using x as delimiter, e.g. 'value1;value2' => ['value1',       
   'value2'] if used with split(;).                                                                           
  autosplit: Automatically split delimited string into separate values; will split strings delimited by      
   comma, semicolon, or space, e.g. 'value1,value2' => ['value1', 'value2'].                                  
  chop(x): Remove x characters off the end of value, e.g. chop(1): 'Value' => 'Valu'; when applied to a list,
   chops characters from each list value, e.g. chop(1): ['travel', 'beach']=> ['trave', 'beac'].              
  chomp(x): Remove x characters from the beginning of value, e.g. chomp(1): ['Value'] => ['alue']; when      
   applied to a list, removes characters from each list value, e.g. chomp(1): ['travel', 'beach']=> ['ravel', 
   'each'].                                                                                                   
  sort: Sort list of values, e.g. ['c', 'b', 'a'] => ['a', 'b', 'c'].                                        
  rsort: Sort list of values in reverse order, e.g. ['a', 'b', 'c'] => ['c', 'b', 'a'].                      
  reverse: Reverse order of values, e.g. ['a', 'b', 'c'] => ['c', 'b', 'a'].                                 
  uniq: Remove duplicate values, e.g. ['a', 'b', 'c', 'b', 'a'] => ['a', 'b', 'c'].                          
  join(x): Join list of values with delimiter x, e.g. join(,): ['a', 'b', 'c'] => 'a,b,c'; the DELIM option  
   functions similar to join(x) but with DELIM, the join happens before being passed to any filters.May       
   optionally be used without an argument, that is 'join()' which joins values together with no delimiter.    
   e.g. join(): ['a', 'b', 'c'] => 'abc'.                                                                     
  append(x): Append x to list of values, e.g. append(d): ['a', 'b', 'c'] => ['a', 'b', 'c', 'd'].            
  prepend(x): Prepend x to list of values, e.g. prepend(d): ['a', 'b', 'c'] => ['d', 'a', 'b', 'c'].         
  remove(x): Remove x from list of values, e.g. remove(b): ['a', 'b', 'c'] => ['a', 'c'].                    
  slice(start:stop:step): Slice list using same semantics as Python's list slicing, e.g. slice(1:3): ['a',   
   'b', 'c', 'd'] => ['b', 'c']; slice(1:4:2): ['a', 'b', 'c', 'd'] => ['b', 'd']; slice(1:): ['a', 'b', 'c', 
   'd'] => ['b', 'c', 'd']; slice(:-1): ['a', 'b', 'c', 'd'] => ['a', 'b', 'c']; slice(::-1): ['a', 'b', 'c', 
   'd'] => ['d', 'c', 'b', 'a']. See also sslice().                                                           
  sslice(start:stop:step): [s(tring) slice] Slice values in a list using same semantics as Python's string   
   slicing, e.g. sslice(1:3):'abcd => 'bc'; sslice(1:4:2): 'abcd' => 'bd', etc. See also slice().             
  filter(x): Filter list of values using predicate x; for example, {folder_album|filter(contains Events)}    
   returns only folders/albums containing the word 'Events' in their path.                                    
  int: Convert values in list to integer, e.g. 1.0 => 1. If value cannot be converted to integer, remove     
   value from list. ['1.1', 'x'] => ['1']. See also float.                                                    
  float: Convert values in list to floating point number, e.g. 1 => 1.0. If value cannot be converted to     
   float, remove value from list. ['1', 'x'] => ['1.0']. See also int.                                        

e.g. if Photo keywords are ["FOO","bar"]:                                                                     

  "{keyword|lower}" renders to "foo", "bar"                                                                  
  "{keyword|upper}" renders to: "FOO", "BAR"                                                                 
  "{keyword|capitalize}" renders to: "Foo", "Bar"                                                            
  "{keyword|lower|parens}" renders to: "(foo)", "(bar)"                                                      

e.g. if Photo description is "my description":                                                                

  "{descr|titlecase}" renders to: "My Description"                                                           

e.g. If Photo is in Album1 in Folder1:                                                                        

  "{folder_album}" renders to ["Folder1/Album1"]                                                             
  "{folder_album(>)}" renders to ["Folder1>Album1"]                                                          
  "{folder_album()}" renders to ["Folder1Album1"]                                                            

[find,replace]: optional text replacement to perform on rendered template value.  For example, to replace "/" 
in an album name, you could use the template "{album[/,-]}".  Multiple replacements can be made by appending  
"|" and adding another find|replace pair.  e.g. to replace both "/" and ":" in album name: "{album[/,-|:,-]}".
find/replace pairs are not limited to single characters.  The "|" character cannot be used in a find/replace  
pair.                                                                                                         

conditional: optional conditional expression that is evaluated as boolean (True/False) for use with the       
?bool_value modifier.  Conditional expressions take the form 'not operator value' where not is an optional    
modifier that negates the operator.  Note: the space before the conditional expression is required if you use 
a conditional expression.  Valid comparison operators are:                                                    

  contains: template field contains value, similar to python's in                                            
  matches: template field contains exactly value, unlike contains: does not match partial matches            
  startswith: template field starts with value                                                               
  endswith: template field ends with value                                                                   
  <=: template field is less than or equal to value                                                          
  >=: template field is greater than or equal to value                                                       
  <: template field is less than value                                                                       
  >: template field is greater than value                                                                    
  ==: template field equals value                                                                            
  !=: template field does not equal value                                                                    

The value part of the conditional expression is treated as a bare (unquoted) word/phrase.  Multiple values may
be separated by '|' (the pipe symbol).  value is itself a template statement so you can use one or more       
template fields in value which will be resolved before the comparison occurs.                                 

For example:                                                                                                  

  {keyword matches Beach} resolves to True if 'Beach' is a keyword. It would not match keyword 'BeachDay'.   
  {keyword contains Beach} resolves to True if any keyword contains the word 'Beach' so it would match both  
   'Beach' and 'BeachDay'.                                                                                    
  {photo.score.overall > 0.7} resolves to True if the photo's overall aesthetic score is greater than 0.7.   
  {keyword|lower contains beach} uses the lower case filter to do case-insensitive matching to match any     
   keyword that contains the word 'beach'.                                                                    
  {keyword|lower not contains beach} uses the not modifier to negate the comparison so this resolves to True 
   if there is no keyword that matches 'beach'.                                                               

Examples: to export photos that contain certain keywords with the osxphotos export command's --directory      
option:                                                                                                       

--directory "{keyword|lower matches travel|vacation?Travel-Photos,Not-Travel-Photos}"                         

This exports any photo that has keywords 'travel' or 'vacation' into a directory 'Travel-Photos' and all other
photos into directory 'Not-Travel-Photos'.                                                                    

This can be used to rename files as well, for example: --filename                                             
"{favorite?Favorite-{original_name},{original_name}}"                                                         

This renames any photo that is a favorite as 'Favorite-ImageName.jpg' (where 'ImageName.jpg' is the original  
name of the photo) and all other photos with the unmodified original name.                                    

?bool_value: Template fields may be evaluated as boolean (True/False) by appending "?" after the field name   
(and following "(field_arg)" or "[find/replace]".  If a field is True (e.g. photo is HDR and field is "{hdr}")
or has any value, the value following the "?" will be used to render the template instead of the actual field 
value.  If the template field evaluates to False (e.g. in above example, photo is not HDR) or has no value    
(e.g. photo has no title and field is "{title}") then the default value following a "," will be used.         

e.g. if photo is an HDR image,                                                                                

  "{hdr?ISHDR,NOTHDR}" renders to "ISHDR"                                                                    

and if it is not an HDR image,                                                                                

  "{hdr?ISHDR,NOTHDR}" renders to "NOTHDR"                                                                   

,default: optional default value to use if the template name has no value.  This modifier is also used for the
value if False for boolean-type fields (see above) as well as to hold a sub-template for values like          
{created.strftime}.  If no default value provided, "_" is used.                                               

e.g., if photo has no title set,                                                                              

  "{title}" renders to "_"                                                                                   
  "{title,I have no title}" renders to "I have no title"                                                     

Template fields such as created.strftime use the default value to pass the template to use for strftime.      

e.g., if photo date is 4 February 2020, 19:07:38,                                                             

  "{created.strftime,%Y-%m-%d-%H%M%S}" renders to "2020-02-04-190738"                                        

Some template fields such as "{media_type}" use the default value to allow customization of the output. For   
example, "{media_type}" resolves to the special media type of the photo such as panorama or selfie.  You may  
use the default value to override these in form: "{media_type,video=vido;time_lapse=vido_acclre}". In    
this example, if photo was a time_lapse photo, media_type would resolve to vido_acclre instead of         
time_lapse.                                                                                                   

Either or both bool_value or default (False value) may be empty which would result in empty string "" when    
rendered.                                                                                                     

If you want to include "{" or "}" in the output, use "{openbrace}" or "{closebrace}" template substitution.   

e.g. "{created.year}/{openbrace}{title}{closebrace}" would result in "2020/{Photo Title}".                    

Variables                                                                                                     

You can define variables for later use in the template string using the format {var:NAME,VALUE}.  Variables   
may then be referenced using the format %NAME. For example: {var:foo,bar} defines the variable %foo to have   
value bar. This can be useful if you want to re-use a complex template value in multiple places within your   
template string or for allowing the use of characters that would otherwise be prohibited in a template string.
For example, the "pipe" (|) character is not allowed in a find/replace pair but you can get around this       
limitation like so: {var:pipe,{pipe}}{title[-,%pipe]} which replaces the - character with | (the value of     
%pipe).                                                                                                       

Variables can also be referenced as fields in the template string, for example:                               
{var:year,created.year}{original_name}-{%year}. In some cases, use of variables can make your template string 
more readable.  Variables can be used as template fields, as values for filters, as values for conditional    
operations, or as default values.  When used as a conditional value or default value, variables should be     
treated like any other field and enclosed in braces as conditional and default values are evaluated as        
template strings. For example: {var:name,Katie}{person contains {%name}?{%name},Not-{%name}}.                 

If you need to use a % (percent sign character), you can escape the percent sign by using %%.  You can also   
use the {percent} template field where a template field is required. For example:                             

{title[:,%%]} replaces the : with % and {title contains Foo?{title}{percent},{title}} adds % to the  title if 
it contains Foo.                                                                                              

With the --directory and --filename options you may specify a template for the export directory or filename,
respectively. The directory will be appended to the export path specified in the export DEST argument to
export.  For example, if template is '{created.year}/{created.month}', and export destination DEST is
'/Users/maria/Pictures/export', the actual export directory for a photo would be
'/Users/maria/Pictures/export/2020/March' if the photo was created in March 2020.

The templating system may also be used with the --keyword-template option to set keywords on export (with
--exiftool or --sidecar), for example, to set a new keyword in format 'folder/subfolder/album' to preserve the
folder/album structure, you can use --keyword-template "{folder_album}" or in the 'folder>subfolder>album'
format used in Lightroom Classic, --keyword-template "{folder_album(>)}".

In the template, valid template substitutions will be replaced by the corresponding value from the table
below.  Invalid substitutions will result in a an error and the script will abort.


                                            Template Substitutions                                            

Substitution                    Description
{name}                          Current filename of the photo
{original_name}                 Photo's original filename when imported to Photos
{title}                         Title of the photo
{descr}                         Description of the photo
{media_type}                    Special media type resolved in this precedence: selfie, time_lapse,
                                panorama, slow_mo, screenshot, portrait, live_photo, burst, photo, video.
                                Defaults to 'photo' or 'video' if no special type. Customize one or more
                                media types using format:
                                '{media_type,video=vido;time_lapse=vido_acclre}'
{photo_or_video}                'photo' or 'video' depending on what type the image is. To customize, use
                                default value as in '{photo_or_video,photo=fotos;video=videos}'
{hdr}                           Photo is HDR?; True/False value, use in format
                                '{hdr?VALUE_IF_TRUE,VALUE_IF_FALSE}'
{edited}                        True if photo has been edited (has adjustments), otherwise False; use in
                                format '{edited?VALUE_IF_TRUE,VALUE_IF_FALSE}'
{edited_version}                True if template is being rendered for the edited version of a photo,
                                otherwise False.
{favorite}                      Photo has been marked as favorite?; True/False value, use in format
                                '{favorite?VALUE_IF_TRUE,VALUE_IF_FALSE}'
{created}                       Photo's creation date in ISO format, e.g. '2020-03-22'
{created.date}                  Photo's creation date in ISO format, e.g. '2020-03-22'
{created.year}                  4-digit year of photo creation time
{created.yy}                    2-digit year of photo creation time
{created.mm}                    2-digit month of the photo creation time (zero padded)
{created.month}                 Month name in user's locale of the photo creation time
{created.mon}                   Month abbreviation in the user's locale of the photo creation time
{created.dd}                    2-digit day of the month (zero padded) of photo creation time
{created.dow}                   Day of week in user's locale of the photo creation time
{created.doy}                   3-digit day of year (e.g Julian day) of photo creation time, starting from 1
                                (zero padded)
{created.hour}                  2-digit hour of the photo creation time
{created.min}                   2-digit minute of the photo creation time
{created.sec}                   2-digit second of the photo creation time
{created.strftime}              Apply strftime template to file creation date/time. Should be used in form
                                {created.strftime,TEMPLATE} where TEMPLATE is a valid strftime template,
                                e.g. {created.strftime,%Y-%U} would result in year-week number of year:
                                '2020-23'. If used with no template will return null value. See
                                https://strftime.org/ for help on strftime templates.
{modified}                      Photo's modification date in ISO format, e.g. '2020-03-22'; uses creation
                                date if photo is not modified
{modified.date}                 Photo's modification date in ISO format, e.g. '2020-03-22'; uses creation
                                date if photo is not modified
{modified.year}                 4-digit year of photo modification time; uses creation date if photo is not
                                modified
{modified.yy}                   2-digit year of photo modification time; uses creation date if photo is not
                                modified
{modified.mm}                   2-digit month of the photo modification time (zero padded); uses creation
                                date if photo is not modified
{modified.month}                Month name in user's locale of the photo modification time; uses creation
                                date if photo is not modified
{modified.mon}                  Month abbreviation in the user's locale of the photo modification time; uses
                                creation date if photo is not modified
{modified.dd}                   2-digit day of the month (zero padded) of the photo modification time; uses
                                creation date if photo is not modified
{modified.dow}                  Day of week in user's locale of the photo modification time; uses creation
                                date if photo is not modified
{modified.doy}                  3-digit day of year (e.g Julian day) of photo modification time, starting
                                from 1 (zero padded); uses creation date if photo is not modified
{modified.hour}                 2-digit hour of the photo modification time; uses creation date if photo is
                                not modified
{modified.min}                  2-digit minute of the photo modification time; uses creation date if photo
                                is not modified
{modified.sec}                  2-digit second of the photo modification time; uses creation date if photo
                                is not modified
{modified.strftime}             Apply strftime template to file modification date/time. Should be used in
                                form {modified.strftime,TEMPLATE} where TEMPLATE is a valid strftime
                                template, e.g. {modified.strftime,%Y-%U} would result in year-week number of
                                year: '2020-23'. If used with no template will return null value. Uses
                                creation date if photo is not modified. See https://strftime.org/ for help
                                on strftime templates.
{today}                         Current date in iso format, e.g. '2020-03-22'
{today.date}                    Current date in iso format, e.g. '2020-03-22'
{today.year}                    4-digit year of current date
{today.yy}                      2-digit year of current date
{today.mm}                      2-digit month of the current date (zero padded)
{today.month}                   Month name in user's locale of the current date
{today.mon}                     Month abbreviation in the user's locale of the current date
{today.dd}                      2-digit day of the month (zero padded) of current date
{today.dow}                     Day of week in user's locale of the current date
{today.doy}                     3-digit day of year (e.g Julian day) of current date, starting from 1 (zero
                                padded)
{today.hour}                    2-digit hour of the current date
{today.min}                     2-digit minute of the current date
{today.sec}                     2-digit second of the current date
{today.strftime}                Apply strftime template to current date/time. Should be used in form
                                {today.strftime,TEMPLATE} where TEMPLATE is a valid strftime template, e.g.
                                {today.strftime,%Y-%U} would result in year-week number of year: '2020-23'.
                                If used with no template will return null value. See https://strftime.org/
                                for help on strftime templates.
{place.name}                    Place name from the photo's reverse geolocation data, as displayed in Photos
{place.country_code}            The ISO country code from the photo's reverse geolocation data
{place.name.country}            Country name from the photo's reverse geolocation data
{place.name.state_province}     State or province name from the photo's reverse geolocation data
{place.name.city}               City or locality name from the photo's reverse geolocation data
{place.name.area_of_interest}   Area of interest name (e.g. landmark or public place) from the photo's
                                reverse geolocation data
{place.address}                 Postal address from the photo's reverse geolocation data, e.g. '2007 18th St
                                NW, Washington, DC 20009, United States'
{place.address.street}          Street part of the postal address, e.g. '2007 18th St NW'
{place.address.city}            City part of the postal address, e.g. 'Washington'
{place.address.state_province}  State/province part of the postal address, e.g. 'DC'
{place.address.postal_code}     Postal code part of the postal address, e.g. '20009'
{place.address.country}         Country name of the postal address, e.g. 'United States'
{place.address.country_code}    ISO country code of the postal address, e.g. 'US'
{searchinfo.season}             Season of the year associated with a photo, e.g. 'Summer'; (Photos 5+ only,
                                applied automatically by Photos' image categorization algorithms).
{exif.camera_make}              Camera make from original photo's EXIF information as imported by Photos,
                                e.g. 'Apple'
{exif.camera_model}             Camera model from original photo's EXIF information as imported by Photos,
                                e.g. 'iPhone 6s'
{exif.lens_model}               Lens model from original photo's EXIF information as imported by Photos,
                                e.g. 'iPhone 6s back camera 4.15mm f/2.2'
{moment}                        The moment title of the photo
{uuid}                          Photo's internal universally unique identifier (UUID) for the photo, a
                                36-character string unique to the photo, e.g.
                                '128FB4C6-0B16-4E7D-9108-FB2E90DA1546'
{shortuuid}                     A shorter representation of photo's internal universally unique identifier
                                (UUID) for the photo, a 22-character string unique to the photo, e.g.
                                'JYsxugP9UjetmCbBCHXcmu'
{id}                            A unique number for the photo based on its primary key in the Photos
                                database. A sequential integer, e.g. 1, 2, 3...etc.  Each asset associated
                                with a photo (e.g. an image and Live Photo preview) will share the same id.
                                May be formatted using a python string format code. For example, to format
                                as a 5-digit integer and pad with zeros, use '{id:05d}' which results in
                                00001, 00002, 00003...etc.
{album_seq}                     An integer, starting at 0, indicating the photo's index (sequence) in the
                                containing album. Only valid when used in a '--filename' template and only
                                when '{album}' or '{folder_album}' is used in the '--directory' template.
                                For example '--directory "{folder_album}" --filename
                                "{album_seq}_{original_name}"'. To start counting at a value other than 0,
                                append append '(starting_value)' to the field name.  For example, to start
                                counting at 1 instead of 0: '{album_seq(1)}'. May be formatted using a
                                python string format code. For example, to format as a 5-digit integer and
                                pad with zeros, use '{album_seq:05d}' which results in 00000, 00001,
                                00002...etc. To format while also using a starting value:
                                '{album_seq:05d(1)}' which results in 0001, 00002...etc.This may result in
                                incorrect sequences if you have duplicate albums with the same name; see
                                also '{folder_album_seq}'.
{folder_album_seq}              An integer, starting at 0, indicating the photo's index (sequence) in the
                                containing album and folder path. Only valid when used in a '--filename'
                                template and only when '{folder_album}' is used in the '--directory'
                                template. For example '--directory "{folder_album}" --filename
                                "{folder_album_seq}_{original_name}"'. To start counting at a value other
                                than 0, append '(starting_value)' to the field name. For example, to start
                                counting at 1 instead of 0: '{folder_album_seq(1)}' May be formatted using a
                                python string format code. For example, to format as a 5-digit integer and
                                pad with zeros, use '{folder_album_seq:05d}' which results in 00000, 00001,
                                00002...etc. To format while also using a starting value:
                                '{folder_album_seq:05d(1)}' which results in 0001, 00002...etc.This may
                                result in incorrect sequences if you have duplicate albums with the same
                                name in the same folder; see also '{album_seq}'.
{comma}                         A comma: ','
{semicolon}                     A semicolon: ';'
{questionmark}                  A question mark: '?'
{pipe}                          A vertical pipe: '|'
{openbrace}                     An open brace: '{'
{closebrace}                    A close brace: '}'
{openparens}                    An open parentheses: '('
{closeparens}                   A close parentheses: ')'
{openbracket}                   An open bracket: '['
{closebracket}                  A close bracket: ']'
{newline}                       A newline: '\n'
{lf}                            A line feed: '\n', alias for {newline}
{cr}                            A carriage return: '\r'
{crlf}                          A carriage return + line feed: '\r\n'
{tab}                           :A tab: '\t'
{osxphotos_version}             The osxphotos version, e.g. '0.51.8'
{osxphotos_cmd_line}            The full command line used to run osxphotos

The following substitutions may result in multiple values. Thus if specified for --directory these could
result in multiple copies of a photo being being exported, one to each directory.  For example: --directory
'{created.year}/{album}' could result in the same photo being exported to each of the following directories if
the photos were created in 2019 and were in albums 'Vacation' and 'Family': 2019/Vacation, 2019/Family

Substitution             Description
{album}                  Album(s) photo is contained in
{folder_album}           Folder path + album photo is contained in. e.g. 'Folder/Subfolder/Album' or just
                         'Album' if no enclosing folder
{project}                Project(s) photo is contained in (such as greeting cards, calendars, slideshows)
{album_project}          Album(s) and project(s) photo is contained in; treats projects as regular albums
{folder_album_project}   Folder path + album (includes projects as albums) photo is contained in. e.g.
                         'Folder/Subfolder/Album' or just 'Album' if no enclosing folder
{keyword}                Keyword(s) assigned to photo
{person}                 Person(s) / face(s) in a photo
{label}                  Image categorization label associated with a photo (Photos 5+ only). Labels are
                         added automatically by Photos using machine learning algorithms to categorize
                         images. These are not the same as {keyword} which refers to the user-defined
                         keywords/tags applied in Photos.
{label_normalized}       All lower case version of 'label' (Photos 5+ only)
{comment}                Comment(s) on shared Photos; format is 'Person name: comment text' (Photos 5+ only)
{exiftool}               Format: '{exiftool:GROUP:TAGNAME}'; use exiftool (https://exiftool.org) to extract
                         metadata, in form GROUP:TAGNAME, from image.  E.g. '{exiftool:EXIF:Make}' to get
                         camera make, or {exiftool:IPTC:Keywords} to extract keywords. See
                         https://exiftool.org/TagNames/ for list of valid tag names.  You must specify group
                         (e.g. EXIF, IPTC, etc) as used in `exiftool -G`. exiftool must be installed in the
                         path to use this template.
{searchinfo.holiday}     Holiday names associated with a photo, e.g. 'Christmas Day'; (Photos 5+ only,
                         applied automatically by Photos' image categorization algorithms).
{searchinfo.activity}    Activities associated with a photo, e.g. 'Sporting Event'; (Photos 5+ only, applied
                         automatically by Photos' image categorization algorithms).
{searchinfo.venue}       Venues associated with a photo, e.g. name of restaurant; (Photos 5+ only, applied
                         automatically by Photos' image categorization algorithms).
{searchinfo.venue_type}  Venue types associated with a photo, e.g. 'Restaurant'; (Photos 5+ only, applied
                         automatically by Photos' image categorization algorithms).
{photo}                  Provides direct access to the PhotoInfo object for the photo. Must be used in
                         format '{photo.property}' where 'property' represents a PhotoInfo property. For
                         example: '{photo.favorite}' is the same as '{favorite}' and '{photo.place.name}' is
                         the same as '{place.name}'. '{photo}' provides access to properties that are not
                         available as separate template fields but it assumes some knowledge of the
                         underlying PhotoInfo class.  See https://rhettbull.github.io/osxphotos/ for
                         additional documentation on the PhotoInfo class.
{detected_text}          List of text strings found in the image after performing text detection. Using
                         '{detected_text}' will cause osxphotos to perform text detection on your photos
                         using the built-in macOS text detection algorithms which will slow down your
                         export. The results for each photo will be cached in the export database so that
                         future exports with '--update' do not need to reprocess each photo. You may pass a
                         confidence threshold value between 0.0 and 1.0 after a colon as in
                         '{detected_text:0.5}'; The default confidence threshold is 0.75. '{detected_text}'
                         works only on macOS Catalina (10.15) or later. Note: this feature is not the same
                         thing as Live Text in macOS Monterey, which osxphotos does not yet support.
{shell_quote}            Use in form '{shell_quote,TEMPLATE}'; quotes the rendered TEMPLATE value(s) for
                         safe usage in the shell, e.g. My file.jpeg => 'My file.jpeg'; only adds quotes if
                         needed.
{strip}                  Use in form '{strip,TEMPLATE}'; strips whitespace from begining and end of rendered
                         TEMPLATE value(s).
{format}                 Use in form, '{format:TYPE:FORMAT,TEMPLATE}'; converts TEMPLATE value to TYPE then
                         formats the value using Python string formatting codes specified by FORMAT; TYPE is
                         one of: 'int', 'float', or 'str'. For example,
                         '{format:float:.1f,{exiftool:EXIF:FocalLength}}' will format focal length to 1
                         decimal place (e.g. '100.0').
{function}               Execute a python function from an external file and use return value as template
                         substitution. Use in format: {function:file.py::function_name} where 'file.py' is
                         the name of the python file and 'function_name' is the name of the function to
                         call. The function will be passed the PhotoInfo object for the photo. See
                         https://github.com/RhetTbull/osxphotos/blob/master/examples/template_function.py
                         for an example of how to implement a template function.

The following substitutions are file or directory paths. You can access various parts of the path using the
following modifiers:

{path.parent}: the parent directory
{path.name}: the name of the file or final sub-directory
{path.stem}: the name of the file without the extension
{path.suffix}: the suffix of the file including the leading '.'

For example, if the field {export_dir} is '/Shared/Backup/Photos':
{export_dir.parent} is '/Shared/Backup'

If the field {filepath} is '/Shared/Backup/Photos/IMG_1234.JPG':
{filepath.parent} is '/Shared/Backup/Photos'
{filepath.name} is 'IMG_1234.JPG'
{filepath.stem} is 'IMG_1234'
{filepath.suffix} is '.JPG'

Substitution  Description
{export_dir}  The full path to the export directory
{filepath}    The full path to the exported file


                                                 Post Command                                                 

You can run commands on the exported photos for post-processing using the '--post-command' option. '--post-
command' is passed a CATEGORY and a COMMAND. COMMAND is an osxphotos template string which will be rendered
and passed to the shell for execution. CATEGORY is the category of file to pass to COMMAND. The following
categories are available:

Category                  Description
exported                  All exported files
new                       When used with '--update', all newly exported files
updated                   When used with '--update', all files which were previously exported but updated
                          this time
skipped                   When used with '--update', all files which were skipped (because they were
                          previously exported and didn't change)
missing                   All files which were not exported because they were missing from the Photos
                          library
exif_updated              When used with '--exiftool', all files on which exiftool updated the metadata
touched                   When used with '--touch-file', all files where the date was touched
converted_to_jpeg         When used with '--convert-to-jpeg', all files which were converted to jpeg
sidecar_json_written      When used with '--sidecar json', all JSON sidecar files which were written
sidecar_json_skipped      When used with '--sidecar json' and '--update', all JSON sidecar files which were
                          skipped
sidecar_exiftool_written  When used with '--sidecar exiftool', all exiftool sidecar files which were written
sidecar_exiftool_skipped  When used with '--sidecar exiftool' and '--update, all exiftool sidecar files
                          which were skipped
sidecar_xmp_written       When used with '--sidecar xmp', all XMP sidecar files which were written
sidecar_xmp_skipped       When used with '--sidecar xmp' and '--update', all XMP sidecar files which were
                          skipped
error                     All files which produced an error during export

In addition to all normal template fields, the template fields '{filepath}' and '{export_dir}' will be
available to your command template. Both of these are path-type templates which means their various parts can
be accessed using the available properties, e.g. '{filepath.name}' provides just the file name without path
and '{filepath.suffix}' is the file extension (suffix) of the file. When using paths in your command template,
it is important to properly quote the paths as they will be passed to the shell and path names may contain
spaces. Both the '{shell_quote}' template and the '|shell_quote' template filter are available for this
purpose.  For example, the following command outputs the full path of newly exported files to file 'new.txt':

--post-command new "echo {filepath|shell_quote} >> {shell_quote,{export_dir}/exported.txt}"

In the above command, the 'shell_quote' filter is used to ensure '{filepath}' is properly quoted and the
'{shell_quote}' template ensures the constructed path of '{exported_dir}/exported.txt' is properly quoted. If
'{filepath}' is 'IMG 1234.jpeg' and '{export_dir}' is '/Volumes/Photo Export', the command thus renders to:

echo 'IMG 1234.jpeg' >> '/Volumes/Photo Export/exported.txt'

It is highly recommended that you run osxphotos with '--dry-run --verbose' first to ensure your commands are
as expected. This will not actually run the commands but will print out the exact command string which would
be executed.


                                                Post Function                                                 

You can run your own python functions on the exported photos for post-processing using the '--post-function'
option. '--post-function' is passed the name a python file and the name of the function in the file to call
using format 'filename.py::function_name'. See the example function at
https://github.com/RhetTbull/osxphotos/blob/master/examples/post_function.py You may specify multiple
functions to run by repeating the --post-function option. All post functions will be called immediately after
export of each photo and immediately before any --post-command commands. Post functions will not be called if
the --dry-run flag is set.


